New Jersey, session 221, A1519.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1979, c.428 (C.18A:35-4.7) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Any child whose parent or guardian [presents to the school principal a signed  statement that any part of the instructions in health, family life education or  sex education is in conflict with his conscience, or sincerely held moral or  religious beliefs] does not provide prior written consent to participate in any health, family life education, or sex education program shall be excused from that portion of the course where such  instruction is being given and no penalties as to credit or graduation shall  result therefrom. (cf: P.L.1979, c.428, s.2) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.